Illinois, session 104th, SB3434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section 62 and by adding Section 77 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/2)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 100-2)8    Sec. 2. Definitions; administrative subdivisions. 9    (a) For the purposes of this Act, unless the context 10otherwise requires:11    "Community day services" or "CDS" means a Home and 12Community-Based Waiver day program that is certified by the 13Department. Community day services provide assistance with 14gaining, maintaining, or improving skills and functioning to 15individuals with developmental disabilities. Services can 16reinforce skills or strategies taught in other settings and 17may include training and supports to help prevent or slow the 18loss of skills. Community day services take place in a 19non-residential setting, separate from the individual's 20residential setting, whether individually owned, controlled, 21or otherwise. Community day services can be provided in a site 22certified by the Department (site-based CDS) or in community 23locations where members of the general community typically   SB3434 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1congregate (non-site-based CDS). CDS activities shall promote 2greater independence and support full access to the general 3community to the same degree as persons not receiving Home and 4Community-Based Waiver services. 5    "Department" means the Department of Human Services, 6successor to the former Department of Mental Health and 7Developmental Disabilities.8    "Developmental disability" means "developmental 9disability" as defined in Section 1-106 of the Mental Health 10and Developmental Disabilities Code.11    "Intellectual disability" means the "intellectual 12disability" as defined in Section 1-116 of the Mental Health 13and Developmental Disabilities Code.14    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Human Services.15    (b) Unless the context otherwise requires:16        (1) References in this Act to the programs or 17    facilities of the Department shall be construed to refer 18    only to those programs or facilities of the Department 19    that pertain to mental health or developmental 20    disabilities.21        (2) References in this Act to the Department's service 22    providers or service recipients shall be construed to 23    refer only to providers or recipients of services that 24    pertain to the Department's mental health and 25    developmental disabilities functions.26        (3) References in this Act to employees of the   SB3434 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1    Department shall be construed to refer only to employees 2    whose duties pertain to the Department's mental health and 3    developmental disabilities functions.4    (c) The Secretary shall establish such subdivisions of the 5Department as shall be desirable and shall assign to the 6various subdivisions the responsibilities and duties placed 7upon the Department by the Laws of the State of Illinois.8    (d) There is established a coordinator of services to deaf 9and hearing impaired persons with mental disabilities. In 10hiring this coordinator, every consideration shall be given to 11qualified deaf or hearing impaired individuals.12    (e) Whenever the administrative director of the 13subdivision for mental health services is not a 14board-certified psychiatrist, the Secretary shall appoint a 15Chief for Clinical Services who shall be a board-certified 16psychiatrist with both clinical and administrative experience. 17The Chief for Clinical Services shall be responsible for all 18clinical and medical decisions for mental health services.19(Source: P.A. 102-972, eff. 1-1-23.) 20    (20 ILCS 1705/77 new)21    Sec. 77. Community day services.22    (a) Community day services certification. An applicant for 23certification as a CDS provider under this Act shall submit an 24application in accordance with the application process 25established by the Department by rule and shall pay an   SB3434 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1application fee in an amount established by the Department, 2which amount shall not be more than $200.3        (1) If an applicant meets the requirements established 4    by the Department to be certified as a CDS provider under 5    this Act, after payment of the certification fee, the 6    Department shall issue a certificate valid for 2 years 7    from the date thereof unless suspended or revoked by the 8    Department or voluntarily surrendered by the CDS provider.9        (2) Upon application to the Department, the Department 10    may issue a temporary certificate to an applicant for up 11    to a 2-year period to allow the holder of such certificate 12    reasonable time to become eligible for a certificate under 13    this Act.14        (3) The Department may conduct site visits to a CDS 15    provider, program, or site certified under this Act to 16    inspect the records or premises, or both, of such 17    provider, program, or site as it deems appropriate, for 18    the purpose of determining compliance with this Act, the 19    Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code, and 20    applicable Department rules and regulations. The 21    Department shall conduct inspections of the records and 22    premises of each CDS provider certified under this Act at 23    least once every 2 years.24        (4) If the Department determines that a CDS provider 25    certified under this Act is not in compliance with this 26    Act or the rules and regulations adopted in accordance   SB3434 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1    with this Act, the Department shall serve a notice of 2    deficiency upon the certified CDS provider. Each notice of 3    deficiency shall be prepared in writing and shall specify 4    the nature of the deficiency, the statutory provision or 5    rule alleged to have been violated, and, if required, that 6    the CDS provider submit a plan of correction to the 7    Department. The notice shall also inform the certified CDS 8    provider of any other action that the Department might 9    take in accordance with this Act and the CDS provider's 10    right to a hearing.11        (5) As determined by the Department, a 12    disproportionate number or percentage of certification 13    complaints; a disproportionate number or percentage of 14    substantiated cases of abuse, neglect, or exploitation 15    involving a CDS provider; an apparent unnatural death of 16    an individual served by a CDS provider; any egregious or 17    life-threatening abuse or neglect caused by a CDS 18    provider; or any other significant event as determined by 19    the Department shall initiate a review of the CDS 20    provider's certificate by the Department, as well as a 21    review of its agreement for funding. The Department shall 22    adopt rules to establish the process by which the 23    determination to initiate a review shall be made and the 24    timeframe to initiate a review upon the making of such 25    determination.26        (6) Upon the expiration of a CDS provider's   SB3434 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1    certificate issued under this Act, the CDS provider shall 2    be required to submit a certification renewal application 3    and pay a certificate renewal fee in an amount to be 4    determined by the Department, which amount shall not be 5    more than $200.6        (7) A former CDS provider that has had a certification 7    revoked under this Act may not apply for or possess a 8    certificate under a different name.9    (b) Registry checks for employees. The Department shall 10require all certified and funded CDS providers to conduct, for 11each employee, checks of the Health Care Worker Registry, the 12Illinois Sex Offender Registry, and the Provider Sanctions 13List maintained by the Department of Healthcare and Family 14Services' Office of the Inspector General. The Department 15shall also require certified and funded CDS agencies to 16conduct a Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 17check of the Department of Children and Family Services' State 18Central Register, and to initiate a criminal history 19background check conducted by the Illinois State Police. These 20required registry checks on employees must be completed at the 21time of hire and annually thereafter during employment. A 22person may not be employed if he or she is found to have 23disqualifying convictions or substantiated cases of abuse or 24neglect. At the time of the annual registry checks, if a 25current employee's name has been placed on a registry with 26disqualifying convictions or disqualifying substantiated cases   SB3434 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1of abuse or neglect, then the employee must be terminated. 2Disqualifying convictions or disqualifying substantiated cases 3of abuse or neglect are defined for the Department of Children 4and Family Services' State Central Register by the Department 5of Children and Family Services' standards for background 6checks in Part 385 of Title 89 of the Illinois Administrative 7Code. Disqualifying convictions or disqualifying substantiated 8cases of abuse or neglect are defined for the Health Care 9Worker Registry by the Health Care Worker Background Check Act 10and the Department's standards for abuse and neglect 11investigations in Section 1-17 of the Department of Human 12Services Act.13        (1) The CANTS check must be submitted to the 14    Department of Children and Family Services and be in the 15    review process prior to the new employee's start date.16        (2) A new employee may begin employment while the 17    outcome of the CANTS check is pending.18        (3) CANTS inquiries shall not occur more than 30 days 19    prior to the first day of employment.20    (c) CANTS or Health Care Worker Registry waiver. In 21collaboration with the Department of Children and Family 22Services, the Department of Human Services shall establish a 23waiver process from the prohibition of employment or 24termination of employment requirements in subsection (b) for 25any applicant or employee listed in CANTS. The waiver process 26for applicants and employees outlined under Section 40 of the   SB3434 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1Health Care Worker Background Check Act shall remain in effect 2for individuals listed on the Health Care Worker Registry.3    (d) Reports. In collaboration with the Department of 4Children and Family Services and that Department's Office of 5Inspector General, as necessary, the Department of Human 6Services shall review intake and investigation reports. 7    Section 10. The Community Services Act is amended by 8changing Section 2 as follows: 9    (405 ILCS 30/2)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 902)10    Sec. 2. Community services system. Services should be 11planned, developed, delivered and evaluated as part of a 12comprehensive and coordinated system. The Department of Human 13Services shall encourage the establishment of services in each 14area of the State which cover the services categories 15described below. What specific services are provided under 16each service category shall be based on local needs; special 17attention shall be given to unserved and underserved 18populations, including children and youth, racial and ethnic 19minorities, and the elderly. The service categories shall 20include:21        (a) Prevention: services designed primarily to reduce 22    the incidence and ameliorate the severity of developmental 23    disabilities, mental illness, and substance use disorders 24    as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act;  SB3434 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1        (b) Client Assessment and Diagnosis: services designed 2    to identify persons with developmental disabilities, 3    mental illness, and substance use disorders; to determine 4    the extent of the disability and the level of functioning; 5    to ensure that the individual's need for treatment of 6    mental disorders or substance use disorders or 7    co-occurring substance use and mental health disorders is 8    determined using a uniform screening, assessment, and 9    evaluation process inclusive of criteria; for purposes of 10    this subsection (b), a uniform screening, assessment, and 11    evaluation process refers to a process that includes an 12    appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a referral; 13    "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular instrument, 14    tool, or process that all must utilize; information 15    obtained through client evaluation can be used in 16    individual treatment and habilitation plans; to assure 17    appropriate placement and to assist in program evaluation;18        (c) Case Coordination: services to provide information 19    and assistance to persons with disabilities to ensure that 20    they obtain needed services provided by the private and 21    public sectors; case coordination services should be 22    available to individuals whose functioning level or 23    history of institutional recidivism or long-term care 24    indicate that such assistance is required for successful 25    community living;26        (d) Crisis and Emergency: services to assist   SB3434 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1    individuals and their families through crisis periods, to 2    stabilize individuals under stress and to prevent 3    unnecessary institutionalization;4        (e) Treatment, Habilitation and Support: services 5    designed to help individuals develop skills which promote 6    independence and improved levels of social and vocational 7    functioning and personal growth; and to provide 8    non-treatment support services which are necessary for 9    successful community living;10        (f) Community Residential Alternatives to 11    Institutional Settings: services to provide living 12    arrangements for persons unable to live independently; the 13    level of supervision, services provided and length of stay 14    at community residential alternatives will vary by the 15    type of program and the needs and functioning level of the 16    residents; other services may be provided in a community 17    residential alternative which promote the acquisition of 18    independent living skills and integration with the 19    community.20        (g) Community Day Services or CDS: a Home and 21    Community-Based Waiver day program that is certified by 22    the Department. Community day services provide assistance 23    with gaining, maintaining, or improving skills and 24    functioning to individuals with developmental 25    disabilities. Services can reinforce skills or strategies 26    taught in other settings and may include training and   SB3434 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18138 KTG 31577 b1    supports to help prevent or slow the loss of skills. 2    Community day services take place in a non-residential 3    setting, separate from the individual's residential 4    setting, whether individually owned, controlled, or 5    otherwise. Community day services can be provided in a 6    site certified by the Department (site-based CDS) or in 7    community locations where members of the general community 8    typically congregate (non-site-based CDS). CDS activities 9    shall promote greater independence and support full access 10    to the general community to the same degree as persons not 11    receiving Home and Community-Based Waiver services. 12(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 100-759, eff. 1-1-19.)